Illinois, session 104th, SB730.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Portable Electronics Insurance Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (215 ILCS 136/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Portable Electronics Insurance Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-366, eff. 1-1-12.)